Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska66-720
License or permit; suspension; grounds; procedure; cancellation; reinstatement fee.

(1) Any license or permit issued by the department under the motor fuel laws may be suspended for the following reasons:

(a) Cancellation of security;

(b) Failure to provide additional security as required;

(c) Failure to file any report or return, filing an incomplete report or return, or not filing electronically, within the time provided;

(d) Failure to pay taxes due within the time provided;

(e) Filing of any false report, return, statement, or affidavit, knowing it to be false;

(f) Delivering motor fuel to a Nebraska destination if Nebraska is not listed as the destination state on the original bill of sale, bill of lading, or manifest except as authorized under section 66-503;

(g) Failure to remain in compliance with requirements of the State Fire Marshal regarding underground storage tanks;

(h) Failure to remain in compliance with requirements of the Department of Agriculture regarding weights and measures;

(i) Using or placing dyed diesel fuel in a motor vehicle except as authorized under section 66-495.01;

(j) No longer being eligible to obtain a license or permit; or

(k) Any other violation of the motor fuel laws or the rules and regulations.

(2) The department shall mail notice of suspension of any license or permit.

(3) The licensee or permitholder may, within sixty days after the mailing of the notice of such suspension, petition the Department of Revenue in writing for a hearing and reconsideration of such suspension. If a petition is filed, the department shall, within ten days of receipt of the petition, set a hearing date at which the licensee or permitholder may show cause why his or her suspended license or permit should not be canceled. The department shall give the licensee or permitholder reasonable notice of the time and place of such hearing. Within a reasonable time after the conclusion of the hearing, the department shall issue an order either reinstating or canceling such license or permit.

(4) If a petition is not filed within the sixty-day period, the suspended license or permit shall be canceled by the department at the expiration of the period.

(5) The department shall not issue a new permit or license to the same person for one year from the date of cancellation. Any reissuance of a permit or license to the same person within three years from the date of cancellation shall require a reinstatement fee of one hundred dollars to be submitted to the department. The department shall remit the fee to the State Treasurer for credit to the Highway Cash Fund.

(6) Suspension or cancellation of a license or permit issued by the department shall not relieve any person from making or filing the reports or returns required by the motor fuel laws in the manner or within the time required.

Laws 1991, LB 627, § 115;

Laws 1992, LB 1013, § 15;

Laws 1993, LB 440, § 12;

Laws 1994, LB 1160, § 100;

Laws 1996, LB 1121, § 7;

Laws 2004, LB 983, § 49;

Laws 2008, LB914, § 2.